Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-503 Supervised
administration; effect on other proceedings. (a) The pendency of a
proceeding for supervised administration of a decedent's estate stays action on
any informal application then pending or thereafter filed.

(b) If a will has been previously probated in
informal proceedings, the effect of the filing of a petition for supervised
administration is as provided for formal testacy proceedings by section
560:3-401.

(c) After the personal representative has
received notice of the filing of a petition for supervised administration, a
personal representative who has been appointed previously shall not exercise
the personal representative's power to distribute any estate. The filing of
the petition does not affect the personal representative's other powers and
duties unless the court restricts the exercise of any of them pending full
hearing on the petition. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next